California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1089, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Section 51749.5 as added by Ch. 1089 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

51749.

(a) The Superintendent, upon the next revision of the California Basic Educational Data System, or its equivalent, following July 1, 1990, shall include all data collection elements necessary to compile an annual statewide profile of pupils participating in independent study, including data on the number and percentage of pupils pursuing their coursework through independent study who successfully complete the requirements for a high school diploma.

(b) Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, the department shall include a required field in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the collection of the number of pupils participating in independent study pursuant to this article for 16 or more schooldays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 67.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51749.3.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish rules and regulations for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51749.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and commencing with the 2015–16 school year, a local educational agency may, for pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, provide independent study courses pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The governing board or body of the local educational agency adopts policies, at a public meeting, that comply with the requirements of this section and any applicable regulations adopted by the state board.

(2) A signed learning agreement is completed and on file pursuant to Section 51749.6.

(3) Courses are taught under the general supervision of certificated employees who hold the
 appropriate subject matter credential pursuant to Section 44300 or 44865, or subdivision (l) of Section 47605, and are employed by the local educational agency at which the pupil is enrolled, or by a local educational agency that has a memorandum of understanding to provide the instruction in coordination with the local educational agency at which the pupil is enrolled.

(4) (A) Courses are annually certified, by local educational agency governing board or body resolution, to be of the same rigor, educational quality, and intellectual challenge substantially equivalent to in-person instruction and equivalent classroom-based courses, and shall be aligned to all relevant local and state content standards. For high schools, this shall include access to all courses offered by the local educational agency for graduation and approved by the University of California or the California State University as creditable under the A-G
 admissions criteria.

(B) This certification shall, at a minimum, include the duration, number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for each schoolday that a pupil is enrolled, number of equivalent total instructional minutes, number of course credits for each course, and a plan as described in subparagraph (C). This information shall be consistent with that of equivalent classroom-based courses.

(C) (i) For pupils in transitional kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for daily synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(ii) For pupils in grades 4 to 8, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for both daily live interaction and at least weekly synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(iii) For pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for at least weekly synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(5) Pupils enrolled in courses authorized by this section shall meet the applicable age requirements established pursuant to Sections 46300.1, 46300.4, 47612, and 47612.1.

(6) Pupils enrolled in courses authorized by this section shall meet the applicable residency and enrollment requirements established pursuant to Sections 46300.2, 47612, 48204, and 51747.3.

(7) (A) An individual with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, may participate in course-based independent study, if the pupil’s individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 3
 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 specifically provides for that participation.

(B) A temporarily disabled pupil shall not receive individual instruction pursuant to Section 48206.3 through course-based independent study.

(8) (A) Satisfactory educational progress shall be determined based on all of the following indicators:

(i) The pupil’s achievement and engagement in the independent study program, as indicated by the pupil’s performance on applicable pupil-level measures of pupil achievement and pupil engagement set forth in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 52060.

(ii) The completion of assignments, assessments, or other indicators that evidence that the pupil is working on
 assignments.

(iii) Learning required concepts, as determined by the supervising teacher.

(iv) Progressing toward successful completion of the course of study or individual course, as determined by the supervising teacher.

(B) If satisfactory educational progress in one or more courses is not being made, certificated employees providing instruction shall notify the pupil and, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, and conduct an evaluation to determine whether it is in the best interest of the pupil to remain in the course or whether the pupil should be referred to an alternative program, which may include, but is not limited to, a regular school program. A written record of the findings of an evaluation made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as a mandatory interim
 pupil record. The record shall be maintained for a period of three years from the date of the evaluation and, if the pupil transfers to another California public school, the record shall be forwarded to that school.

(C) Procedures for tiered reengagement strategies for all pupils who are not making satisfactory educational progress in one or more courses, or who are in violation of the written learning agreement pursuant to Section 51749.6. These procedures shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(i) Verification of current contact information for each enrolled pupil.

(ii) A plan for outreach from the school to determine pupil needs, including connection with health and social services as necessary.

(iii) A clear
 standard for requiring a pupil-parent-educator conference to review a pupil’s written learning agreement, and reconsider the independent study course’s impact on the pupil’s achievement and well-being.

(D) Written or computer-based evidence of satisfactory educational progress, as described in subparagraph (A), shall be retained for each course and pupil. At a minimum, this evidence shall include a grade book or summary document that, for each course, lists all assignments, examinations, and associated grades.

(9) A plan to transition pupils whose families wish to return to in-person instruction from course-based independent study expeditiously, and, in no case, later than five instructional days.

(10) A proctor shall administer examinations.

(11) (A) Statewide testing results for pupils enrolled in any course authorized pursuant to this section shall be reported and assigned to the school or charter school at which the pupil is enrolled, and to any school district, charter school, or county office of education within which that school’s or charter school’s testing results are aggregated.

(B) Statewide testing results for pupils enrolled in a course or courses pursuant to this section shall be disaggregated for purposes of comparing the testing results of those pupils to the testing results of pupils enrolled in classroom-based courses.

(12) A pupil shall not be required to enroll in courses authorized by this section.

(13) The pupil-to-certificated-employee ratio limitations established pursuant to Section 51745.6 are
 applicable to courses authorized by this section.

(14) For each pupil, the combined equivalent daily instructional minutes for enrolled courses authorized by this section and enrolled courses authorized by all other laws and regulations shall meet the minimum instructional day requirements applicable to the local educational agency. Pupils enrolled in courses authorized by this section shall be offered the minimum annual total equivalent instructional minutes pursuant to Sections 46200 to 46208, inclusive, and Section 47612.5.

(15) Courses required for high school graduation or for admission to the University of California or California State University shall not be offered exclusively through independent study.

(16) A pupil participating in independent study shall not be assessed a fee prohibited by Section
 49011.

(17) A pupil shall not be prohibited from participating in independent study solely on the basis that the pupil does not have the materials, equipment, or internet access that are necessary to participate in the independent study course.

(b) Subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of, subparagraph (C) of paragraph (8) of, and paragraph (9) of, subdivision (a) shall not apply to pupils that participate in an independent study program for fewer than 16 schooldays in a school year or to pupils enrolled in a comprehensive school for classroom-based instruction who, under the care of appropriately licensed professionals, participate in independent study due to necessary medical treatments or inpatient treatment for mental health care or substance abuse. Local educational agencies shall obtain evidence from appropriately licensed professionals of the need for pupils to participate in independent study pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) For purposes of computing average daily attendance for each pupil enrolled in one or more courses authorized by this section, the following computations shall apply:

(1) (A) For each schoolday, add the combined equivalent daily instructional minutes, as certified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), for courses authorized by this section in which the pupil is enrolled.

(B) For each schoolday, add the combined daily instructional minutes of courses authorized by all other laws and regulations in which the pupil is enrolled and for which the pupil meets applicable attendance requirements.

(C) For each schoolday, add the sum of subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) If subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) meets applicable minimum schoolday requirements for each schoolday, and all other requirements in this section have been met, credit each schoolday that the pupil is demonstrating satisfactory educational
 progress pursuant to the requirements of this section, with up to one schoolday of attendance.

(3) (A) Using credited schoolday attendance pursuant to paragraph (2), calculate average daily attendance pursuant to Section 41601 or 47612, whichever is applicable, for each pupil.

(B) The average daily attendance computed pursuant to this subdivision shall not result in more than one unit of average daily attendance per pupil.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, average daily attendance computed for pupils enrolled in courses authorized by this section shall not be credited with average daily attendance other than what is specified in this section.

(5) If more than 10 percent of the total average daily attendance of a local educational
 agency is claimed pursuant to this section, then the amount of average daily attendance for all pupils enrolled by that school district, charter school, or county office of education in courses authorized pursuant to this section that is in excess of 10 percent of the total average daily attendance for the local educational agency shall be reduced by either (A) the statewide average rate of absence for elementary school districts for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, or (B) the statewide average rate of absence for high school districts for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as applicable, as calculated by the department for the prior fiscal year, with the resultant figures and ranges rounded to the nearest 10th.

(d) For purposes of this section, “equivalent total instructional minutes” means the same number of minutes as required for an equivalent classroom-based course.

(e) This section does not prohibit the right to collectively bargain any subject within the scope of representation pursuant to Section 3543.2 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) The Superintendent shall conduct an evaluation of independent study courses offered pursuant to this section and report the findings to the Legislature and the Director of Finance no later than September 1, 2019. The report shall, at a minimum, compare the academic performance of pupils in independent study with demographically similar pupils enrolled in equivalent classroom-based courses.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on September 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be
 submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate verification of the ratios included in this section, including fiscal penalties for noncompliance as described in this section.

(2) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate compliance reviews for subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, unless compliance verification for those subdivisions is already included in the audit guide. Findings of noncompliance shall result in the loss of apportionment equal to the average daily attendance impacted by the noncompliance.

(h) The provisions of this section are not subject to waiver by the state board, by the Superintendent, or under any provision of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 18.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51749.6.

(a) Before enrolling a pupil in a course authorized by Section 51749.5, each local educational agency shall provide the pupil and, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, with a written learning agreement that includes all of the following:

(1) A summary of the policies and procedures adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency pursuant to Section 51749.5, as applicable.

(2) The duration of the enrolled course or courses, the duration of the learning agreement, and the number of course credits for each enrolled course consistent with the certifications adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency pursuant to
 Section 51749.5. The duration of a learning agreement shall not exceed a school year or span multiple school years.

(3) The learning objectives and expectations for each course, including, but not limited to, a description of how satisfactory educational progress is measured and when a pupil evaluation is required to determine whether the pupil should remain in the course or be referred to an alternative program, which may include, but is not limited to, a regular school program.

(4) The specific resources, including materials and personnel, that will be made available to the pupil. These resources shall include confirming or providing access to all pupils to the connectivity and devices adequate to participate in the educational program and complete assigned work.

(5) A statement detailing the academic and other
 supports that will be provided to address the needs of pupils who are not performing at grade level, or need support in other areas, such as English learners, individuals with exceptional needs in order to be consistent with the pupil’s individualized education program or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils in foster care or experiencing homelessness, and pupils requiring mental health supports.

(6) A statement that enrollment in a course authorized pursuant to Section 51749.5 is an optional educational alternative in which no pupil may be required to participate. In the case of a pupil who is referred or assigned to any school, class, or program pursuant to Section 48915 or 48917, the agreement also shall include the statement that instruction may be provided to the pupil through course-based independent study only if the pupil is offered the alternative of classroom
 instruction.

(7) The manner, time, frequency, and place for submitting a pupil’s assignments, for reporting the pupil’s academic progress, and for communicating with a pupil’s parent or guardian regarding a pupil’s academic progress.

(8) The objectives and methods of study for the pupil’s work, and the methods used to evaluate that work.

(9) A statement of the adopted policies regarding the maximum length of time allowed between the assignment and the completion of a pupil’s assigned work, the level of satisfactory educational progress, and the number of missed assignments allowed before an evaluation of whether or not the pupil should be allowed to continue in course-based independent study.

(10) A statement of the number of course credits or, for the
 elementary grades, other measures of academic accomplishment appropriate to the learning agreement, to be earned by the pupil upon completion.

(b) (1) (A) For independent study programs projected to last more than 15 schooldays for an individual pupil, the learning agreement shall be signed, before the commencement of an independent study course, by the pupil, the pupil’s parent, legal guardian, or caregiver, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of the independent study course, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable.

 (B) For independent study programs projected to last fewer than 16 schooldays for an individual pupil, each learning
 agreement shall be signed, during the school year in which the independent study program takes place, by the pupil, the pupil’s parent, legal guardian, or caregiver, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of independent study, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable. The written agreement may be signed at any time during the school year, but it is the intent of the Legislature that parents or guardians of pupils be provided the agreement at or before the beginning of the school year.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “caregiver” means a person who has met the requirements of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 6550) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(2) The signed learning agreement
 constitutes permission from a pupil’s parent or legal guardian, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, for the pupil to receive instruction through course-based independent study.

(3) Either an original document or an electronic file of the original document is allowable documentation for auditing purposes.

(4) For purposes of this section, an electronic file includes a computer or electronic stored image of an original document, including, but not limited to, portable document format (PDF), JPEG, or other digital image file type, that may be sent via fax machine, email, or other electronic means.

(5) Signed written agreements, supplemental agreements, assignment records, work samples, and attendance records assessing time value of work or evidence that an instructional activity occurred may be maintained as an
 electronic file.

(6) Written agreements may be signed using an electronic signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature. The use of an electronic signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for digital signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, are satisfied.

(7) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2021–22 school year only, a local educational agency shall obtain a signed written agreement for independent study from the pupil, or the pupil’s
 parent or legal guardian if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of the independent study course, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable, no later than 30 days after the first day of instruction. This subparagraph does not relieve a local educational agency from the obligation to comply with the requirements of this article, as amended by the act adding this paragraph, upon commencement of instruction for a participating pupil in the 2021–22 school year.

(8) (A) For the 2021–22 school year only, school districts and county offices of education shall notify the parents and guardians of all enrolled pupils of their options to enroll their child in in-person instruction or independent study during the 2021–22 school year. This
 notice shall include written information on the local educational agency’s internet website, including, but not limited to, the right to request a pupil-parent-educator conference meeting before enrollment pursuant to this section, pupil rights regarding procedures for enrolling, disenrolling, and reenrolling in independent study, and the synchronous and asynchronous instructional time that a pupil will have access to as part of independent study. If 15 percent or more of the pupils enrolled in a local educational agency that provides instruction in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, speak a single primary language other than English, as determined from the census data submitted to the department pursuant to Section 52164 in the preceding year, the written information shall, in addition to being written in English, be written in the primary language.

(B) Upon the request of the parent or guardian of a
 pupil, and before signing a written agreement pursuant to this section, the local educational agency shall conduct a telephone, videoconference, or in-person pupil-parent-educator conference or other school meeting during which the pupil, parent or guardian, and, if requested by the pupil or parent, an education advocate, may ask questions about the educational options, including which curriculum offerings and nonacademic supports will be available to the pupil in independent study, before making the decision about enrollment or disenrollment in the various options for learning.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of this section, paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 46300, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 51749.5 for the 2021–22 school year only, a local educational agency shall be eligible to receive apportionments for independent study for pupils that are subject to quarantine for
 exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state health guidance, and the pupil cannot participate in classroom-based instruction due to the quarantine, and for school closures due to COVID-19 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41422. Local educational agencies shall receive apportionment for these pupils for all schooldays that they participate in and meet all other apportionment requirements of independent study while in quarantine or during a school closure.

(d) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate compliance reviews for subdivisions (a) and (b) unless compliance verification for those subdivisions is already included in the audit guide. Findings of noncompliance shall result in the loss of apportionment equal to the average daily attendance impacted by the noncompliance.

(e) The provisions of this section are not subject to waiver by the state board, by the Superintendent, or under any provision of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 69.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Military Science and Tactics [51750. - 51750.]

51750.

The governing board of any school district maintaining a secondary school may establish in the school courses in military science and tactics complying with the laws of the United States made and provided with reference to Reserve Officers Training Corps units in educational institutions.

No student enrolled in any such school shall be required to enroll in any course in military science and tactics.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Work Experience Education [51760. - 51769.5.]

51760.

The governing board of a district maintaining a high school may do all of the following:

(a) Provide for the instruction of pupils in the skills, attitudes, and understanding necessary to succeed in employment by means of courses of work-based learning or work experience education as provided in this article.

(b) Provide for guidance and supervision procedures designed to ensure maximum educational benefit to pupils from placement in suitable work-based learning or work experience education courses.

(c) Provide for arranging, approving, coordinating, and awarding credit for
 work-based learning or work experience education courses, and for those purposes employ instructors, coordinators, and other necessary personnel.

(d) Provide for the district to purchase liability insurance for pupils enrolled in programs of study involving work experience, which may include work-based learning, or vocational education at locations off school grounds approved by the governing board, or require pupils to purchase insurance and to pass on all or a portion of the costs, at the discretion of the governing board, to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 254, Sec. 2.   (AB 2211)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51760.1.

(a) Consistent with the most recent state plan on career technical education, work-based learning opportunities for pupils may be delivered by partnership academies conducted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29, regional occupational programs, as defined in Section 52303, programs established pursuant to Section 88532, and local educational agencies, and may include, but are not limited to, work experience education, as defined in Section 51764, community classrooms, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 52372.1, cooperative career technical education programs, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 52372.1, and job shadowing experience, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 51769.

(b) School districts and community colleges that receive funding to provide career technical education programs pursuant to Section 52055.770 may include a work-based learning component in these programs.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, school districts opting to offer work-based learning opportunities to pupils enrolled in the district shall ensure that, when applicable, pupils are afforded the same statutory and regulatory safeguards as pupils in work experience programs.

(d) For purposes of this section, “work-based learning” means an educational approach or instructional methodology that uses the workplace or real work to provide pupils with the knowledge and skills that will help them connect school experiences to real-life work activities and future career opportunities. When feasible, work-based learning
 should be an integral part of a more comprehensive program that integrates academic courses and career technical education.

(e) High-quality work-based learning may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Emphasis on learning in the workplace.

(2) Exposure to a wide range of career areas and worksites in order to help youth make informed choices about education, training options, and career pursuits.

(3) Thoughtful placement of pupils into opportunities that are evaluated for their safety, qualified supervision, and learning opportunities.

(4) Appropriate sequencing of experiences based upon the pupil’s age and maturity, ranging from site visits and tours, job shadowing,
 unpaid and paid internships, and paid work experience.

(5) Explicit aim to supplement, or systematically reinforce, classroom instruction in technical courses, academic courses, or both.

(6) Systematic attention to the development of 21st century skills, such as communication, problem solving, teamwork, project planning, and critical thinking.

(7) A trained mentor who structures the learning at the worksite.

(8) Coordination between the classroom teacher and the workplace mentor or supervisor.

(9) Built-in regular assessment and feedback.

(10) Involvement of youth in choosing and structuring the experience.

(11) Clear and measurable learning outcomes.

(f) School districts are encouraged to work with local workforce investment board youth councils and workforce investment boards to maximize the use of available resources for youth employment opportunities by coordinating work-based learning opportunities and facilitating work-based learning regional planning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 254, Sec. 3.   (AB 2211)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51760.2.

Regional and local business organizations, in conjunction with school districts and community colleges, and any other representatives deemed appropriate, including, but not limited to, industry representatives, research centers, and parents, may develop principles and guidelines for the establishment of work-based learning programs. If these organizations develop principles and guidelines pursuant to this section, both of the following shall occur:

(a) The organizations shall consider existing guidelines or regulations relative to the programs described in subdivision (a) of Section 51760.1, the state’s most recent career technical education plan, and the most current academic and career technical education standards
 adopted by the state board.

(b) The guidelines shall include specific guidance to school districts and community colleges on ensuring that a pupil’s workplace learning opportunities are linked directly to academic learning objectives and provide the necessary skills for the pupil to use in future employment or postsecondary education opportunities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 254, Sec. 4.   (AB 2211)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51760.3.

The governing board of any school district offering work experience education pursuant to the authority of Section 51760 shall grant credit to pupils satisfactorily completing a work experience education program, in an amount not to exceed a total of 40 semester credits, of which no more than 10 credits may be conferred in any one semester, provided the pupil meets all of the following requirements:

(a) At the time of enrollment, the pupil is at least 16 years of age. Pupils under the age of 16 years may receive credit for work experience education under the following conditions:

(1) The pupil is enrolled in grade 11 or a higher grade.

(2) The principal of the school in which the pupil is enrolled certifies that the pupil is in need of immediate work experience education in order to pursue employment opportunities.

(3) The principal of the school in which the pupil is enrolled certifies that there is a probability that the pupil will no longer be enrolled as a full-time pupil without being provided the opportunity to enroll in a work experience education program.

(4) The pupil is at least 14 years of age and the principal in the school in which the pupil is enrolled certifies that it is necessary for the pupil’s participation in a career technical education program.

(5) The pupil’s individualized education program, adopted pursuant to the requirements of Part 30 (commencing with Section
 56000), prescribes the type of training for which participation in a work experience program is deemed appropriate.

(b) During the course of the pupil’s enrollment in the program, the pupil receives as a minimum the equivalent of one instructional period per week of classroom instruction or counseling by a certificated employee. The instruction or counseling shall be offered in sessions scheduled intermittently throughout the semester.

(c) The work experience education program meets all of the requirements of law governing these programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

51760.5.

Notwithstanding Section 51760, attendance in work experience classes or programs maintained by a regional occupational center or regional occupational program shall not receive apportionments from state funds based on average daily attendance unless such classes or programs are in conformance with standards adopted pursuant to Section 52372.

A student enrolled in a vocational education class using the cooperative vocational education methodology conducted by a regional occupational center or program shall not be credited with more than 15 hours of attendance in any calendar week for purposes of the methodology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective September 9, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

51762.

The Department of Education shall adopt any rules and regulations necessary to implement the standards set by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in order to maintain the educational purpose and character of work experience education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1024, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

51762.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt standards for district plans required by subdivision (b) of Section 46300. The adopted standards shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Selection and approval of work stations.

(b) Classroom instruction.

(c) Supervision of pupils.

(d) Formal training agreements.

(e) Paid and unpaid on-the-job work experience programs.

(f) Academic credit for participation in work experience education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1024, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

51763.

All laws or rules applicable to minors in employment relationships are applicable to students enrolled in work experience education courses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51764.

Work experience education as authorized by this article includes the employment of pupils in part-time jobs selected or approved as having educational value for the students employed therein and coordinated by school employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51765.

(a) The governing board of a school district that establishes and supervises a work experience education program in which pupils with intellectual disabilities are employed in part-time jobs may use funds derived from any source, to the extent permissible by appropriate law or regulation, to pay the wages of pupils so employed.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the authority granted by this section is necessary to ensure that the work experience education program will continue to provide maximum educational benefit to pupils, particularly pupils with intellectual disabilities, and that the program is deemed to serve a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 589, Sec. 12.   (AB 2662)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

51766.

Work experience education involving apprenticeable occupations shall be consistent with the purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code and with standards established by the California Apprenticeship Council for programs in the building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 3.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51767.

The governing board of any school district which maintains one or more high schools may provide for the establishment and supervision of work experience education programs in areas outside the district, either within this state or in a contiguous state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

51768.

The governing board of any school district providing work experience and work study education may provide for employment under the program of pupils in part-time jobs located in areas outside the district, either within this state or in a contiguous state, and the employment may be by any public or private employer. The districts may pay wages to persons receiving the training whether assigned within or without the district and may provide workers’ compensation insurance as may be necessary, but no payments may be made to or for private employers. However, wages to individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, may be paid to or for private employers as part of work experience programs funded through the annual Budget Act for these individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 11.3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

51769.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code or the Labor Code to the contrary, the school district, county superintendent of schools, or any school administered by the State Department of Education, under whose supervision work experience education, cooperative vocational education, or community classrooms, as defined by regulations adopted by the Superintendent, or a job shadowing experience, as defined in subdivision (b), or student apprenticeship programs registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for registered student apprentices, are provided, shall be considered the employer under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code of persons receiving this training unless the